Massachusetts, session 194th, S1381.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 123 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof 
the following subsection:- 
(a) A physician who is licensed pursuant to section 2 of chapter 112, an advanced 
practice registered nurse authorized to practice as such under regulations promulgated pursuant 
to section 80B of said chapter 112, a qualified psychologist licensed pursuant to sections 118 to 
129, inclusive, of said chapter 112, a licensed independent clinical social worker licensed 
pursuant to sections 130 to 137, inclusive, of said chapter 112, or a licensed mental health 
counselor licensed pursuant to section 165 of chapter 112 who, after examining a person and 
evaluating the risk of serious harm, has reason to believe that failure to hospitalize such person 
would create a likelihood of serious harm to themselves or others by reason of mental health 
issues may restrain or authorize the restraint of such person and apply for the hospitalization of 

of 3 13 such person for a 3-day period at a public facility or at a private facility authorized for such 
purposes by the department. If an examination is not possible because of the emergency nature of 
the case and because of the refusal of the person to consent to such examination, the physician, 
qualified psychologist, qualified advanced practice registered nurse, licensed independent 
clinical social worker or licensed mental health counselor on the basis of the facts and 
circumstances may determine that hospitalization is necessary and may therefore apply. In an 
emergency situation, if a physician, qualified psychologist, qualified advanced practice 
registered nurse, licensed independent clinical social worker or licensed mental health counselor 
is not available, a police officer who believes that failure to hospitalize a person would create a 
likelihood of serious harm to self or others may restrain such person and apply for an evaluation 
of the need for hospitalization of such person for a 3-day period at a public facility or a private 
facility authorized for such purpose by the department. An application for an evaluation of the 
need for hospitalization shall state the reasons for the referral and possible restraint of such 
person and any other relevant information related to the degree of risk for serious harm to self or 
others that may assist the admitting physician or qualified advanced practice registered nurse. 
Whenever practicable, prior to transporting such person, the applicant shall telephone or 
otherwise communicate with a facility to describe the circumstances and known clinical history 
and to determine whether the facility is the proper facility to receive such person and to give 
notice of any restraint to be used and to determine whether such restraint is necessary. 
SECTION 3. Section 22 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words “police officers” in line 3 the following words:- , licensed mental health 
counselors. 

of 3 35  SECTION 4. Said section 22 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the words “police officer” in line 9 the following words:- licensed 
mental health counselor.